Colorado, session 2026A, SB100.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-4-401, add
(1.5), (2.3), and (2.5) as follows:
26.5-4-401. Definitions.
As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1.5) "CHAPERONE" MEANS A PERSON WHO ACCOMPANIES A YOUTH
SPORTS ORGANIZATION IN AN OFFICIAL CAPACITY ON A TRIP THAT
INCLUDES ONE OR MORE OVERNIGHT STAYS.
(2.3) "EMPLOYMENT" MEANS A JOB OR POSITION IN WHICH A
PERSON MAY BE ENGAGED IN THE SERVICE OF A COACH OF A YOUTH
ATHLETIC ACTIVITY BY A YOUTH SPORTS ORGANIZATION FOR A SALARY OR
HOURLY WAGES, WHETHER FULL-TIME OR PART-TIME, AND WHETHER
TEMPORARY OR PERMANENT.
(2.5) "YOUTH ATHLETIC ACTIVITY" MEANS AN ORGANIZED
ATHLETIC ACTIVITY IN WHICH THE MAJORITY OF THE PARTICIPANTS ARE
UNDER EIGHTEEN YEARS OF AGE AND ARE ENGAGING IN AN ORGANIZED
ATHLETIC GAME, COMPETITION, OR TRAINING PROGRAM. "YOUTH
ATHLETIC ACTIVITY" DOES NOT INCLUDE AN ATHLETIC ACTIVITY THAT IS
INCIDENTAL TO A NONATHLETIC PROGRAM OR A LESSON.
-2- SB26-100

SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 26.5-4-401.5 as
follows:
26.5-4-401.5. Organized youth athletic activities - CPR and
first aid requirements.
(1) (a) EACH YOUTH SPORTS ORGANIZATION SHALL ENSURE THAT
AT LEAST ONE ADULT WHO POSSESSES A CURRENT FIRST AID, CPR, AND
AED CERTIFICATION IS PRESENT AT EACH YOUTH ATHLETIC ACTIVITY.
(b) A YOUTH ATHLETIC ACTIVITY THAT IS CONDUCTED ENTIRELY
BY VOLUNTEERS FOR TRAINING PURPOSES ONLY IS EXEMPT FROM THIS
SECTION, BUT THE VOLUNTEERS ARE STRONGLY ENCOURAGED TO POSSESS
A CURRENT FIRST AID, CPR, AND AED CERTIFICATION.
(2) (a) THE FIRST AID, CPR, AND AED EDUCATION COURSES
REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION MUST INCLUDE:
(I) IDENTIFYING SIGNS OF AND TREATING:
(A) HEAT- AND COLD-RELATED CONDITIONS;
(B) EXTERNAL BLEEDING;
(C) MUSCULAR AND SKELETAL INJURIES; AND
(D) HEAD, NECK, AND SPINAL INJURIES; AND
(II) CPR AND AED TRAINING.
(b) EACH YOUTH SPORTS ORGANIZATION MAY DESIGNATE SPECIFIC
EDUCATION COURSES AS SUFFICIENT TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION ABROGATES OR LIMITS THE
PROTECTIONS APPLICABLE TO PUBLIC ENTITIES AND PUBLIC EMPLOYEES
PURSUANT TO THE "COLORADO GOVERNMENTAL IMMUNITY ACT",
ARTICLE 10 OF TITLE 24; VOLUNTEERS AND BOARD MEMBERS PURSUANT
TO SECTIONS 13-21-115.7 AND 13-21-116; OR SKI AREA OPERATORS
-3- SB26-100

PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 33-44-112 AND 33-44-113.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26.5-4-403, amend
(1); and add (1.5) as follows:
26.5-4-403. Background checks required.
(1) (a) (I) A youth sports organization operating in the state of
Colorado shall require all coaches AND CHAPERONES WHO WORK
DIRECTLY, OR WILL WORK DIRECTLY, WITH YOUTH, to obtain, prior to
starting work EMPLOYMENT OR TAKING AN OVERNIGHT TRIP, AND EVERY
THREE YEARS THEREAFTER FOR THE DURATION OF EMPLOYMENT OR
CHAPERONE INVOLVEMENT, A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK, a
SEVEN-YEAR criminal history record check THAT INCLUDES ALIASES OF
THE COACH OR CHAPERONE by a private entity regulated as a consumer
reporting agency pursuant to 15 U.S.C. sec. 1681, et seq., and that
discloses, at a minimum, sexual offenses and felony convictions and
includes a social security number trace and a search of the Colorado
judicial public records access system. FOR A COACH OR CHAPERONE WHO
WAS HIRED OR APPROVED AS A COACH OR CHAPERONE PRIOR TO THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION, THE YOUTH SPORTS ORGANIZATION
SHALL REQUIRE THE COACH OR CHAPERONE TO OBTAIN A CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORD CHECK THAT CONFORMS TO THIS SECTION WITHIN SIX
MONTHS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.
(II) IF A COACH OR CHAPERONE HAS LIVED OUTSIDE OF THE UNITED
STATES FOR MORE THAN ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY DAYS IN THE PAST TEN
YEARS OR FOR MORE THAN ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY DAYS AFTER THE
COACH'S OR CHAPERONE'S LAST CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK, THE
COACH OR CHAPERONE SHALL ALSO OBTAIN AN INTERNATIONAL CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORD CHECK THAT INCLUDES ALIASES OF THE COACH OR
-4- SB26-100

CHAPERONE, AND THAT, AT A MINIMUM, DISCLOSES SEXUAL OFFENSES AND
FELONY CONVICTIONS; EXCEPT THAT, IF THE COACH OR CHAPERONE IS IN
THE COUNTRY ON AN INTERNATIONAL WORK VISA, THEN THE COACH OR
CHAPERONE IS EXEMPT FROM THIS SUBSECTION (1)(a)(II).
(III) The criminal history record check must ascertain, to the
GREATEST extent possible, whether the person being investigated has been
convicted of felony child abuse as specified in section 18-6-401; a felony
offense involving unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section
16-22-102 (9); A CRIME OF VIOLENCE AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION
18-1.3-406; A CRIME LISTED IN SECTION 18-1.3-406 (2)(a)(II); or a
comparable offense committed in any other state.
(b) A youth sports organization shall not hire a coach OR APPROVE
A PERSON AS A CHAPERONE if a criminal history record check of the
person performed pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section shows that
the person has been convicted of, pled nolo contendere to, or has received
a deferred sentence or deferred prosecution for felony child abuse, as
specified in section 18-6-401; a felony offense involving unlawful sexual
behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102 (9); A CRIME OF VIOLENCE AS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 18-1.3-406; A CRIME LISTED IN SECTION 18-1.3-406
(2)(a)(II); or any comparable offense committed in any other state.
(1.5) (a) A PERSON, INCLUDING AN EMPLOYEE OR VOLUNTEER WHO
TAKES PART IN THE ACTIVITIES OF A YOUTH SPORTS ORGANIZATION BUT
WHO IS NOT REQUIRED TO OBTAIN A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, OR IS UNABLE TO OBTAIN A CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORD CHECK, MUST AT ALL TIMES BE SUPERVISED BY A PERSON
WHO HAS BEEN HIRED OR APPROVED AFTER OBTAINING A CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORD CHECK PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION.
-5- SB26-100

(b) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION, A YOUTH
SPORTS ORGANIZATION IS NOT REQUIRED TO PERFORM A CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORD CHECK ON A VOLUNTEER WHO IS NOT ACTING IN THE
CAPACITY OF A COACH OR MANAGER AND ONLY OCCASIONALLY ASSISTS
IN A PASSING, GENERAL, OR NOMINAL MANNER. A VOLUNTEER DESCRIBED
BY THIS SUBSECTION (1.5)(b) MUST BE SUPERVISED AT ALL TIMES BY A
PERSON WHO HAS BEEN HIRED OR APPROVED AFTER OBTAINING A
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 13-80-103.4 as
follows:
13-80-103.4. Limitation of actions - failure to perform a
background check by a youth sports organization - injury to a child
- definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "CHILD" MEANS A PERSON WHO IS UNDER EIGHTEEN YEARS OF
AGE.
(b) "LOCAL GOVERNMENT" HAS THE SAME MEANING AS SET FORTH
IN SECTION 29-1-102.
(c) "SEXUAL OFFENSE AGAINST A CHILD" INCLUDES ALL OFFENSES
LISTED IN SECTION 18-3-411 (1).
(d) "YOUTH SPORTS ORGANIZATION" HAS THE SAME MEANING AS
SET FORTH IN SECTION 26.5-4-401.
(e) "YOUTH SPORTS REQUIRED BACKGROUND CHECK" MEANS A
BACKGROUND CHECK THAT COMPLIES WITH SECTION 26.5-4-403,
29-7.1-102, OR 29-7.1-103.
-6- SB26-100

(2) IN BRINGING A CIVIL ACTION FOR FAILURE TO PERFORM A
YOUTH SPORTS REQUIRED BACKGROUND CHECK PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION, A PLAINTIFF SHALL MAKE A PRIMA FACIE SHOWING OF THE
FOLLOWING FACTS AND CIRCUMSTANCES:
(a) (I) THE YOUTH SPORTS ORGANIZATION OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT, IN HIRING AN INDIVIDUAL TO WORK WITH CHILDREN OR IN
A SETTING WITH CHILDREN, DID NOT PERFORM A YOUTH SPORTS REQUIRED
BACKGROUND CHECK ON THE INDIVIDUAL, AND THE FAILURE TO CONDUCT
THE REQUIRED BACKGROUND CHECK WAS THE RESULT OF THE YOUTH
SPORTS ORGANIZATION'S OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S DELIBERATE
INDIFFERENCE OR RECKLESS DISREGARD OF ITS OBLIGATION TO CONDUCT
THE BACKGROUND CHECK AS PROVIDED BY LAW. ORDINARY NEGLIGENCE
OR UNINTENTIONAL OVERSIGHT IS NOT SUFFICIENT TO BRING AN ACTION.
(II) THE YOUTH SPORTS ORGANIZATION OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT,
IN HIRING AN INDIVIDUAL TO WORK WITH CHILDREN OR IN A SETTING WITH
CHILDREN, PERFORMED A YOUTH SPORTS REQUIRED BACKGROUND CHECK
OF THE INDIVIDUAL AND THE REQUIRED BACKGROUND CHECK SHOWED
THAT THE INDIVIDUAL WAS INELIGIBLE TO BE HIRED OR APPROVED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 26.5-4-403 (1)(b), 29-7.1-102, OR 29-7.1-103; OR
(III) THE INDIVIDUAL WAS NOT REQUIRED TO OBTAIN A CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORD CHECK OR WAS UNABLE TO OBTAIN A CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORD CHECK AND THE YOUTH SPORTS ORGANIZATION OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT FAILED TO HAVE THE INDIVIDUAL SUPERVISED BY AN
EMPLOYEE OR VOLUNTEER WHO WAS HIRED OR APPROVED AFTER
OBTAINING A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK;
(b) THE INDIVIDUAL, AT THE TIME OF HIRING, WAS NOT ELIGIBLE
TO BE HIRED PURSUANT TO SECTION 26.5-4-403 (1)(b), 29-7.1-102, OR
-7- SB26-100

29-7.1-103; AND
(c) THE INDIVIDUAL COMMITTED ONE OF THE FOLLOWING
OFFENSES AGAINST A CHILD WITH WHOM THE INDIVIDUAL CAME IN
CONTACT IN THE COURSE OF THE INDIVIDUAL'S EMPLOYMENT WITH THE
YOUTH SPORTS ORGANIZATION OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT:
(I) SEXUAL ASSAULT AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 18-3-402;
(II) SEXUAL OFFENSE AGAINST A CHILD;
(III) CHILD ABUSE AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 18-6-401;
(IV) A CRIME OF VIOLENCE AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 18-1.3-406;
OR
(V) A CRIME LISTED IN SECTION 18-1.3-406 (2)(a)(II).
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 29-7.1-101
as follows:
29-7.1-101. Definitions.
As used in this article 7.1, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Coach" means a person employed or volunteering as a coach,
manager, or supervisor of a youth athletic activity but does not include
occasional assistance with or support of the youth athletic activity by a
person, including the action of other volunteers or employees of the local
government in a passing, general, or nominal manner. "CHAPERONE"
MEANS A PERSON WHO ACCOMPANIES A YOUTH ATHLETIC ACTIVITY IN AN
OFFICIAL CAPACITY ON A TRIP THAT INCLUDES ONE OR MORE OVERNIGHT
STAYS.
(2) "COACH" MEANS A PERSON EMPLOYED OR VOLUNTEERING AS
A COACH, MANAGER, OR SUPERVISOR OF A YOUTH ATHLETIC ACTIVITY BUT
DOES NOT INCLUDE OCCASIONAL ASSISTANCE WITH OR SUPPORT OF THE
YOUTH ATHLETIC ACTIVITY BY A PERSON, INCLUDING THE ACTION OF
-8- SB26-100

OTHER VOLUNTEERS OR EMPLOYEES OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT IN A
PASSING, GENERAL, OR NOMINAL MANNER.
(3) "EMPLOYMENT" MEANS A JOB OR POSITION IN WHICH A PERSON
MAY BE ENGAGED IN THE SERVICE OF A COACH OF A YOUTH ATHLETIC
ACTIVITY BY A LOCAL GOVERNMENT FOR SALARY OR HOURLY WAGES,
WHETHER FULL TIME OR PART TIME, AND WHETHER TEMPORARY OR
PERMANENT.
(2) (4) "Local government" has the same meaning as set forth in
section 29-1-102.
(3) (5) "Youth athletic activity" means an organized athletic
activity in which the majority of the participants are less than eighteen
years of age and are engaging in an organized athletic game, competition,
or training program. "Youth athletic activity" does not include travel or
trips not organized or supervised by the local government OR AN
ATHLETIC ACTIVITY THAT IS INCIDENTAL TO A NONATHLETIC PROGRAM OR
A LESSON.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 29-7.1-103
as follows:
29-7.1-103. Criminal history record check for paid coaches.
(1) (a) (I) Prior to the employment of any A person as a coach of
OR APPROVAL AS A CHAPERONE OF a youth athletic activity by a local
government, the local government shall require a SEVEN-YEAR criminal
history record check of the person by a private entity regulated as a
consumer reporting agency pursuant to 15 U.S.C. sec. 1681, et seq., that
discloses, at a minimum, sexual offenses and felony convictions and
includes a social security number trace and a search of the Colorado
judicial public records access system.
-9- SB26-100

(II) IF A COACH OR CHAPERONE HAS LIVED OUTSIDE OF THE UNITED
STATES FOR MORE THAN ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY DAYS IN THE PAST TEN
YEARS OR FOR MORE THAN ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY DAYS AFTER THE
COACH'S OR CHAPERONE'S LAST CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK WAS
CONDUCTED, THE COACH OR CHAPERONE SHALL ALSO OBTAIN AN
INTERNATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK, WHICH INCLUDES
ALIASES OF THE COACH OR CHAPERONE, THAT, AT A MINIMUM, DISCLOSES
SEXUAL OFFENSES AND FELONY CONVICTIONS; EXCEPT THAT, IF THE
COACH OR CHAPERONE IS IN THE COUNTRY ON AN INTERNATIONAL WORK
VISA, THEN THE COACH OR CHAPERONE IS EXEMPT FROM THIS SUBSECTION
(1)(a)(II).
(a.5) EACH JULY 1, THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL REQUIRE A
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK IN CONFORMITY WITH THE PROVISIONS
OF THIS SECTION OF EACH PERSON EMPLOYED AS A COACH OR APPROVED
AS A CHAPERONE OF A YOUTH ATHLETIC ACTIVITY WHO HAS NOT HAD A
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK IN THE LAST THREE YEARS.
(b) The criminal history record check must ascertain whether the
person being investigated has been convicted of, pled nolo contendere to,
or has received a deferred sentence or deferred prosecution for felony
child abuse as specified in section 18-6-401; a felony offense involving
unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102 (9); A CRIME
OF VIOLENCE AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 18-1.3-406; A CRIME LISTED IN
SECTION 18-1.3-406 (2)(a)(II); or a comparable offense committed in any
other state.
(2) A person who has been convicted of, pled nolo contendere to,
or received a deferred sentence or deferred prosecution for felony child
abuse as specified in section 18-6-401; a felony offense involving
-10- SB26-100

unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102; A CRIME OF
VIOLENCE AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 18-1.3-406; A CRIME LISTED IN
SECTION 18-1.3-406 (2)(a)(II); A COMPARABLE CHILD ABUSE OR
UNLAWFUL SEXUAL BEHAVIOR OFFENSE COMMITTED IN ANY OTHER STATE;
or a AN offense committed in any other state is disqualified from
employment as a coach of a youth athletic activity.
(3) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL REQUIRE THAT A PERSON,
INCLUDING A COACH WHO TAKES PART IN THE ACTIVITIES OF A YOUTH
SPORTS ACTIVITY BUT WHO IS NOT REQUIRED TO OBTAIN A CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORD CHECK PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION OR IS UNABLE TO
OBTAIN A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK, BE SUPERVISED AT ALL
TIMES BY A COACH WHO HAS BEEN HIRED OR APPROVED AFTER OBTAINING
A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF
THIS SECTION.
(4) A PERSON WHO ACTS AS AN EMPLOYED COACH OF A YOUTH
ATHLETIC ACTIVITY SHALL POSSESS A CURRENT FIRST AID, CPR, AND AED
CERTIFICATION AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 26.5-4-402 (2).
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 29-7.1-103.5 as
follows:
29-7.1-103.5. Criminal history record check for volunteer
coaches - CPR and first aid training.
(1) (a) (I) PRIOR TO THE START OF A PERSON AS A VOLUNTEER
COACH OF A YOUTH ATHLETIC ACTIVITY BY A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, THE
LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL REQUIRE A SEVEN-YEAR CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORD CHECK OF THE PERSON BY A PRIVATE ENTITY REGULATED AS A
CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCY PURSUANT TO 15 U.S.C. SEC. 1681, ET
SEQ., THAT DISCLOSES, AT A MINIMUM, SEXUAL OFFENSES AND FELONY
-11- SB26-100

CONVICTIONS AND INCLUDES A SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER TRACE AND A
SEARCH OF THE COLORADO JUDICIAL PUBLIC RECORDS ACCESS SYSTEM.
(II) IF A VOLUNTEER COACH HAS LIVED OUTSIDE OF THE UNITED
STATES FOR MORE THAN ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY DAYS IN THE PAST TEN
YEARS OR FOR MORE THAN ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY DAYS AFTER THE
VOLUNTEER COACH'S LAST CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK WAS
CONDUCTED, THE VOLUNTEER COACH SHALL ALSO OBTAIN AN
INTERNATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK, INCLUDING ALIASES
OF THE VOLUNTEER COACH, THAT, AT A MINIMUM, DISCLOSES SEXUAL
OFFENSES AND FELONY CONVICTIONS; EXCEPT THAT, IF THE VOLUNTEER
COACH IS IN THE COUNTRY ON AN INTERNATIONAL WORK VISA, THEN THE
VOLUNTEER COACH IS EXEMPT FROM THIS SUBSECTION (1)(a)(II).
(b) THE CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK MUST ASCERTAIN
WHETHER THE PERSON BEING INVESTIGATED HAS BEEN CONVICTED OF
FELONY CHILD ABUSE AS SPECIFIED IN SECTION 18-6-401, A FELONY
OFFENSE INVOLVING UNLAWFUL SEXUAL BEHAVIOR AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 16-22-102 (9), A CRIME OF VIOLENCE AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION
18-1.3-406, A CRIME LISTED IN SECTION 18-1.3-406 (2)(a)(II), OR A
COMPARABLE OFFENSE COMMITTED IN ANY OTHER STATE.
(2) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL NOT APPROVE A PERSON
CONVICTED OF FELONY CHILD ABUSE AS SPECIFIED IN SECTION 18-6-401,
A FELONY OFFENSE INVOLVING UNLAWFUL SEXUAL BEHAVIOR AS DEFINED
IN SECTION 16-22-102, A CRIME OF VIOLENCE AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION
18-1.3-406, A CRIME LISTED IN SECTION 18-1.3-406 (2)(a)(II), OR A
COMPARABLE OFFENSE COMMITTED IN ANY OTHER STATE AS AN
UNSUPERVISED VOLUNTEER COACH OF A YOUTH ATHLETIC ACTIVITY.
(3) (a) A PERSON, INCLUDING A COACH OR VOLUNTEER WHO TAKES
-12- SB26-100

PART IN THE ACTIVITIES OF A YOUTH SPORTS ORGANIZATION BUT WHO IS
NOT REQUIRED TO OBTAIN A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK PURSUANT
TO THIS SECTION OR IS UNABLE TO OBTAIN A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
CHECK, MUST AT ALL TIMES BE SUPERVISED BY A COACH OR VOLUNTEER
WHO HAS BEEN HIRED OR APPROVED AFTER OBTAINING A CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORD CHECK PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION, A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT IS NOT REQUIRED TO PERFORM A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
CHECK ON A VOLUNTEER WHO IS NOT ACTING IN THE CAPACITY OF A
COACH AND ONLY OCCASIONALLY ASSISTS IN A PASSING, GENERAL, OR
NOMINAL MANNER. A VOLUNTEER DESCRIBED BY THIS SUBSECTION (3)(b)
SHALL BE SUPERVISED AT ALL TIMES BY A COACH OR VOLUNTEER WHO HAS
BEEN HIRED OR APPROVED AFTER OBTAINING A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
CHECK PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION.
(4) A PERSON WHO ACTS AS A VOLUNTEER COACH OF A YOUTH
ATHLETIC ACTIVITY SHALL POSSESS A CURRENT FIRST AID, CPR, AND AED
CERTIFICATION AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 26.5-4-402 (2).
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-7.1-104, amend
(2), (3), and (4) as follows:
29-7.1-104. Criminal history record checks - fees - reliance -
not an open record.
(2) This article 7.1 does not require a second or subsequent
criminal history record check for a coach OR VOLUNTEER COACH who has
had a criminal history record check prior to August 7, 2024.
(3) A local government may rely on the results of the criminal
history record check when making hiring and employment decisions AND
WHEN MAKING THE DECISION TO ALLOW A PERSON TO ACT AS A
-13- SB26-100

CHAPERONE OR VOLUNTEER COACH and is immune from civil liability
unless the local government knows the information is false or acts with
reckless disregard concerning the veracity of such information.
(4) Any information received by a local government on the
criminal history record check for a coach, CHAPERONE, OR VOLUNTEER
COACH as required by this article 7.1 is not subject to the provisions of
part 2 of article 72 of title 24.
SECTION 9. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-14- SB26-100